California, session 20252026, AB1999.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4825.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4825.1. These definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter as it applies to veterinary medicine.(a) “Animal” means any member of the animal kingdom other than humans and includes fowl, fish, and reptiles, wild or domestic, whether living or dead. (b) “Client” means the individual or individuals who represent to the veterinarian that they are the owner or owners of the animal patient at the time that the services are provided.(c) “Diagnosis” means the act or process of identifying or determining the health status of an animal patient through examination and the opinion derived from that examination.(d) “Electronic communication technology” means electronic devices and systems that transfer electronic content that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Email.(2) Live chats and synchronous, two-way text messaging.(3) Still photographs.(4) Synchronous video and audio communication.(5) Synchronous, two-way audio communication.(6) Telephone and voicemail.(7) Videos.(e) “Food animal” means any animal that is raised for the production of an edible product intended for consumption by humans. The edible product includes, but is not limited to, milk, meat, and eggs. Food animal includes, but is not limited to, cattle (beef or dairy), swine, sheep, poultry, fish, and amphibian species.(f) “Herd” means any group of two or more animals of the same species and located at the same geographic location. (g) “Livestock” includes all animals, poultry, and aquatic and amphibian species that are raised, kept, or used for profit. It does not include those species that are usually kept as pets such as dogs, cats, and pet birds, or companion animals, including equines.(h) “Teleconsultation” means communication via electronic communication technology between a California-licensed veterinarian who has established the veterinarian-client-patient relationship for the animal patient, and an individual whose expertise, in the opinion of the California-licensed veterinarian, would benefit the animal patient, but who does not have a veterinarian-client-patient relationship for the animal patient, does not have direct communication with the client or the client’s agent, and does not have ultimate authority over the care or primary diagnosis of the animal patient.(i) “Telemedicine” means the use of electronic communication technology to practice veterinary medicine.(j) “Teletriage” means the use of electronic communication to diagnose and treat a medical emergency, as defined in Section 4840.5, without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship, until the animal patient is transported to, or seen by, a veterinarian.SEC. 2. Section 4826.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4826.6. (a) A veterinarian shall not prescribe, dispense, or administer a drug, medicine, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals unless a veterinarian-client-patient relationship exists or as otherwise permitted by law, except when the animal patient is a wild animal, the owner of the animal patient is unknown, or a rabies vaccination is prophylactically administered to the animal patient to prevent disease or loss of life. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship exists if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The client has authorized the veterinarian to assume responsibility for medical judgments regarding the health of the animal patient.(2) The veterinarian possesses sufficient knowledge of the animal patient.(3) The veterinarian has assumed responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal patient.(b) A veterinarian possesses sufficient knowledge of the animal patient for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if the veterinarian has recently seen, or is personally acquainted with, the care of the animal patient by doing any of the following:(1) Examining the animal patient in person.(2) Examining the animal patient by use of synchronous audio-video audiovideo communication.(3) Making medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises on which the animal patient is kept.(c) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a), the client may authorize an agent to act on the client’s behalf.(d) A veterinarian shall communicate with the client a medical, treatment, diagnostic, or therapeutic plan for each medical condition for which the veterinarian may prescribe, dispense, or administer treatment of whatever nature under the veterinarian-client-patient relationship. If the medical, treatment, diagnostic, or therapeutic plan for a medical condition changes from that which was initially communicated to the client, the veterinarian shall attempt to communicate the necessary changes with the client in a timely manner.(e) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship shall not be established solely by audio-only communication or by means of a questionnaire.(f) Only a person who holds a current license to practice veterinary medicine in this state is authorized to practice veterinary medicine via telemedicine on an animal patient located in this state. (f)(g) Before delivering veterinary medicine via telemedicine, the veterinarian shall inform the client about the use and potential limitations of telemedicine and obtain consent from the client to use telemedicine, including acknowledgment of all of the following:(1) The same standards of care apply to veterinary medicine services via telemedicine and in-person veterinary medical services.(2) The client has the option to choose an in-person visit from a veterinarian at any time.(3) The client has been advised how to receive followup care or assistance in the event of an adverse reaction to the treatment or in the event of an inability to communicate resulting from technological or equipment failure.(g)(h) A veterinarian who practices veterinary medicine via telemedicine shall do all of the following:(1) Ensure that the technology, method, and equipment used to provide veterinary medicine services via telemedicine comply with all current privacy protection laws.(2) Have historical knowledge of the animal patient by obtaining and reviewing the animal patient’s relevant medical history, and, if available, medical records. If medical records exist from a previous in-person visit and are available to the client, the client may transmit those records, including any diagnostic data contained therein, to the veterinarian electronically.(3) Employ sound professional judgment to determine whether using telemedicine is an appropriate method for delivering medical treatment to the animal patient and providing quality of care consistent with prevailing veterinary medical practice.(4) Be familiar with available medical resources, including emergency resources near the animal patient’s location, be able to provide the client with a list of nearby veterinarians who may be able to see the animal patient in person upon the request of the client, and keep, maintain, and make available a summary of the animal patient record, as specified in Section 4855.(5) Provide the client with the veterinarian’s name, contact information, and license number.(6) Secure an alternative means of contacting the client if the electronic means is interrupted.(h)(i) (1) A veterinarian shall not prescribe a drug for a duration of time that is inconsistent with the medical condition of the animal patient or the type of drug prescribed.(2) A veterinarian who prescribes a drug or medication shall notify the client that some prescription drugs or medications may be available at a pharmacy and, if requested, the veterinarian shall submit a prescription to a pharmacy that the client chooses.(3) Except as provided in paragraphs (4) to (6), inclusive, a veterinarian who practices telemedicine may order, prescribe, or make available drugs, as defined in Section 11014 of the Health and Safety Code, in accordance with all relevant state and federal regulations. (4) An antimicrobial drug prescribed to the animal patient via telemedicine shall not exceed 14 days of treatment. A veterinarian shall not issue any further antimicrobial drug prescription, including a refill, to treat the condition of the animal patient unless the veterinarian has conducted an in-person examination of the animal patient. (5) A veterinarian shall not order, prescribe, or make available a controlled substance, as defined in Section 4021, or xylazine, unless the veterinarian has performed an in-person physical examination of the animal patient or made medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal patient is kept.(6) A veterinarian shall not prescribe via telemedicine any drug or medication for use on a horse engaged in racing or training at a facility under the jurisdiction of the California Horse Racing Board pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19400) of Division 8.(i)(j) As used in this section, “drug” means any controlled substance, as defined in Section 4021, or any dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022.(j)(k) A veterinarian is permitted to use teletriage without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship.(k)(l) The veterinarian-client-patient relationship shall expire one year after examining the animal patient pursuant to paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (b) or six months after examining the animal patient pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). Upon expiration of the veterinarian-client-patient relationship, a new veterinarian-client-patient relationship shall be established to prescribe, dispense, or administer a drug, medicine, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of the animal patient.(l)(m) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship may continue to exist in the absence of the veterinarian if all of the following are met:(1) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship was established with an original veterinarian, and a subsequent veterinarian serves in the absence of the original veterinarian at the same location where the medical records are kept.(2) The subsequent veterinarian has assumed responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal patient.(3) The subsequent veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal patient to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal patient through one of the following methods:(A) Examining the animal patient in person.(B) Examining the animal patient via telemedicine.(C) Making medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal patient is kept.(D) Consulting with the original veterinarian who established the veterinarian-client-patient relationship.(4) The subsequent veterinarian has continued the medical, treatment, diagnostic, or therapeutic plan that was set forth and documented in the medical record by the original veterinarian.(5) If the medical, treatment, diagnostic, or therapeutic plan differs from that which was communicated to the client or the client’s agent by the original veterinarian, then the subsequent veterinarian has attempted to communicate the necessary changes with the client or the client’s agent in a timely manner.(m)(n) In the absence of the originally prescribing veterinarian who established the veterinarian-client-patient relationship, a subsequent veterinarian may prescribe, dispense, or furnish a refill of drugs for use on the animal patient if either of the following applies:(1) The drugs are prescribed, dispensed, or furnished on an emergency basis for a traveling animal patient only as necessary to maintain the health of the animal patient until the animal patient can return to the originally prescribing veterinarian. Before providing a prescription refill pursuant to this paragraph, the veterinarian shall make a reasonable effort to contact the originally prescribing veterinarian and document the communication with, or the attempt to contact, the originally prescribing veterinarian in the animal patient’s medical record.(2) The subsequent veterinarian serves at the same location as the originally prescribing veterinarian, who was unavailable to authorize the refill, and the subsequent veterinarian authorizing the refill does all of the following:(A) Possesses and reviews the animal patient’s records.(B) Orders the refill of a medically indicated prescription for an amount not exceeding the original prescription in strength or amount and not exceeding more than one refill.(C) Enters the prescription refill in the animal patient’s medical records.(D) In the subsequent veterinarian’s professional judgment, determines that failure to refill the prescription might interrupt the animal patient’s ongoing care and might have an adverse effect on the animal patient’s well-being.SEC. 3. Section 4827 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4827. (a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person from:(1) (A) Practicing veterinary medicine as a bona fide owner of one’s own animals, except for the procedures specified in Section 4826.8. This exemption applies to the following:(i) The owner’s bona fide employees.(ii) Any person assisting the owner, provided that the practice is performed gratuitously.(B) The exemption authorized under subparagraph (A) does not include a surgical or dental operation upon an animal under subdivision (d) of Section 4826.(C) For purposes of this paragraph, an “operation” means any procedure performed on an animal in which the skin or tissue of the animal is penetrated or severed, but does not include any of the following:(i) Administering injectable drugs.(ii) Artificial insemination.(iii) Castrating male livestock or dehorning or branding animals.(iv) Inserting a microchip for identifying an animal.(v) Placing an ear tag or tattoo for identifying an animal.(vi) Venipuncture for diagnostic purposes.(2) Lay testing of poultry by the whole blood agglutination test. For purposes of this section, “poultry” means flocks of avian species maintained for food production, including, but not limited to, chickens, turkeys, and exotic fowl.(3) Making any determination as to the status of pregnancy, sterility, or infertility upon livestock, equine, or food animals at the time an animal is being inseminated, providing no charge is made for this determination.(4) Administering sodium pentobarbital for euthanasia of sick, injured, homeless, or surrendered domestic pets or animals without the presence of a veterinarian when the person is administering the treatment in their capacity as an employee of an animal control shelter and its agencies or humane society and has received proper training in the administration of sodium pentobarbital for these purposes.(5) Providing the following care to animals lawfully deposited with or impounded by a shelter not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853:(A) Administering preventative or prophylactic nonprescription vaccinations to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state for the purposes of preventing the spread of communicable diseases, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription preventative or prophylactic vaccinations.(B) Administering nonprescription medications to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state, for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites, including, but not limited to, fleas, ticks, or worms, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription medications for the control or eradication of those internal or external parasites. A person’s decision to administer these medications shall not be construed to mean the person has made a diagnosis of the animal’s medical condition.(C) Administering medications prescribed by a veterinarian licensed in the state to the animal without the presence of a veterinarian when the shelter has received a written treatment plan from the licensed veterinarian for that specific animal and has a dispensing protocol in place for the tracking of dispensed prescribed medications and when the person has received proper training in the administration of prescription medications.(b) For the purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):(1) “Proper training” means completing a training curriculum of at least four hours provided by a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state, and includes, but is not limited to, an overview of intake procedures and preventative medicine, recognizing when an animal is required to be seen by a veterinarian, prescription and nonprescription medications, humane animal restraint techniques, vaccination injection methods and procedures, and documentation.(2) “Shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.(c) A shelter providing care to an animal pursuant to this section that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853 shall report to the board any adverse event resulting in significant impairment or death from the care provided, on a form prescribed by the board, including severe injuries, infections, and unintended reactions caused by the incorrect or inappropriate administration of a vaccine or medications.(d) Except for the procedures specified in Section 4826.8, nothing in this chapter prohibits an organization accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA), or a university, college, or governmental research agency from practicing veterinary medicine on an animal owned by that entity.SEC. 4. Section 4830 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4830. (a) This chapter does not apply to:(1) Veterinarians while serving in any armed branch of the military service of the United States or the United States Department of Agriculture while actually engaged and employed in their official capacity.(2) Veterinarians holding a current, valid license in good standing in another state or country who provide assistance through any means, including via teleconsultation, to a California-licensed veterinarian and attend on a specific case. The California-licensed veterinarian shall maintain a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship. The veterinarian providing the assistance shall not establish a veterinarian-client-patient relationship with the client by attending the case or at a future time and shall not practice veterinary medicine, open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, communicate with clients who reside within the limits of this state, give orders, or have ultimate authority over the care or primary diagnosis of a patient that is located within this state.(3) Veterinarians called into the state by a law enforcement agency or animal control agency pursuant to subdivision (b).(4) A student of a veterinary medical program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association Council on Education who participates as part of the student’s formal curriculum in the diagnosis and treatment with direct supervision by a California-licensed veterinarian, or in surgery with immediate supervision by a California-licensed veterinarian, provided all of the following requirements are met:(A) The clinical training site has been approved by the university where the student is enrolled.(B) The student has prior training in diagnosis, treatment, and surgery as part of the formal curriculum.(5) A veterinarian who is employed by the Meat and Poultry Inspection Branch of the California Department of Food and Agriculture while actually engaged and employed in the veterinarian’s official capacity. A person exempt under this paragraph shall not otherwise engage in the practice of veterinary medicine unless the person is issued a license by the board.(6) Unlicensed personnel employed by the Department of Food and Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture when in the course of their duties they are directed by a veterinarian supervisor to conduct an examination, obtain biological specimens, apply biological tests, or administer medications or biological products as part of government disease or condition monitoring, investigation, control, or eradication activities.(7) A person who is not licensed pursuant to this chapter who provides teleconsultation to a California-licensed veterinarian.(b) (1) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a regularly licensed veterinarian in good standing who is called from another state by a law enforcement agency or animal control agency, as defined in Section 31606 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to attend to cases that are a part of an investigation of an alleged violation of federal or state animal fighting or animal cruelty laws within a single geographic location shall be exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter if the law enforcement agency or animal control agency determines that it is necessary to call the veterinarian in order for the agency or officer to conduct the investigation in a timely, efficient, and effective manner. In determining whether it is necessary to call a veterinarian from another state, consideration shall be given to the availability of veterinarians in this state to attend to these cases. An agency, department, or officer that calls a veterinarian pursuant to this subdivision shall notify the board of the investigation.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a regularly licensed veterinarian in good standing who is called from another state to attend to cases that are a part of an investigation described in paragraph (1) may provide veterinary medical care for animals that are affected by the investigation with a temporary shelter facility, and the temporary shelter facility shall be exempt from the registration requirement of Section 4853 if all of the following conditions are met:(A) The temporary shelter facility is established only for the purpose of the investigation.(B) The temporary shelter facility provides veterinary medical care, shelter, food, and water only to animals that are affected by the investigation.(C) The temporary shelter facility complies with Section 4854.(D) The temporary shelter facility exists for not more than 60 days, unless the law enforcement agency or animal control agency determines that a longer period of time is necessary to complete the investigation.(E) Within 30 calendar days upon completion of the provision of veterinary health care services at a temporary shelter facility established pursuant to this section, the veterinarian called from another state by a law enforcement agency or animal control agency to attend to a case shall file a report with the board. The report shall contain the date, place, type, and general description of the care provided, along with a listing of the veterinary health care practitioners who participated in providing that care.(c) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the board may inspect temporary facilities established pursuant to this section.SEC. 5. Section 4840.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4840.5. Under conditions of an emergency, a registered veterinary technician may render lifesaving aid and treatment through any means, including via teletriage, as may be prescribed under regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4836. That emergency aid and treatment, if rendered to an animal patient not in the presence of a licensed veterinarian, may only be continued under the direction of a licensed veterinarian. “Emergency,” for the purpose of this section, means that the animal has been placed in a life-threatening condition in which immediate treatment is necessary.SEC. 6. Section 4843.5 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 4844 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 8. Section 4846.3 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4846.3. (a) To obtain a retired status, a veterinarian or registered veterinary technician shall complete a board-provided application and pay the applicable fee specified in Section 4905.(b) A retired status shall not be granted while there is a pending complaint, investigation, or enforcement action against the licensee or registrant, or the license or registration is revoked, surrendered, or subject to term and conditions of probation.(c) A licensee or registrant with retired status shall not practice veterinary medicine.(d) A licensee or registrant with retired status shall use their professional title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following their professional title.(e) The board may investigate potential violations of this chapter or take action against a licensee or registrant with retired status for a violation of this chapter.(f) A licensee or registrant with retired status shall be exempt from renewal requirements and shall not be subject to delinquency fees or accrued and unpaid renewal fees pursuant to Section 121.5.SEC. 9. Section 4846.4 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4846.4. (a) To obtain a retired volunteer status, a veterinarian or registered veterinary technician shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Complete an application provided by the board.(2) Certify that the sole purpose of the retired volunteer status is to provide voluntary, unpaid, veterinary medical services to an animal shelter.(3) Pay the applicable fee specified in Section 4905.(4) Disclose each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant currently holds or has ever held a license, registration, permit, or certificate to practice veterinary medicine. The license, registration, permit, or certificate verification, including any disciplinary or enforcement history, shall be confirmed by the board through electronic means or direct submission from each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant has identified the applicant holds or has ever held a license, registration, permit, or certificate to practice veterinary medicine.(5) Hold one of the following:(A) A California license or registration that is active or was placed in retired or expired status within the last five years.(B) A California license or registration placed in retired or expired status more than five years ago or a veterinarian license or veterinary technician registration in any state, Canadian province, or United States territory. Applicants applying under this subparagraph shall also do all of the following:(i) Submit a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and undergo a state and federal criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(ii) Certify completion of the required number of continuing education hours pursuant to Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 4858).(iii) Veterinarians shall also pass an examination administered by the board concerning the statutes and regulations of this chapter pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4846.(b) The application for retired volunteer status shall be subject to denial in accordance with Sections 480 and 4883.(c) An application for retired volunteer status shall not be granted while there is a pending complaint, investigation, or enforcement action against the licensee or registrant.(d) A licensee or registrant with retired volunteer status shall not practice veterinary medicine in any circumstance other than for an animal shelter or pursuant to Section 4826.1, 4826.4, 4840.5, or 4840.6, as applicable. A licensee or registrant with retired volunteer status shall only practice veterinary medicine within their scope of practice authorized by this chapter.(e) In addition to complying with the renewal requirements specified in Section 4900, the licensee or registrant with retired volunteer status shall certify that the sole purpose of the retired volunteer status is to provide voluntary, unpaid veterinary medical services for an animal shelter.(f) An out-of-state veterinarian license or veterinary technician registration with retired volunteer status pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) shall not qualify for license restoration under Section 4901 or 4902.(g) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Animal shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group. (2) “Rescue group” means a nonprofit entity that removes animals from a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane shelter, or rehomes an animal that has been previously owned by any person other than the original breeder of that animal. SEC. 10. Section 4848.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4848.2. (a) An individual engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, as defined in Section 4826, as a veterinarian for an animal shelter shall hold a shelter veterinarian license issued pursuant to this section or a license to practice veterinary medicine issued pursuant to Section 4846.(b) To obtain a shelter veterinarian license, an individual shall meet the following requirements:(1) Be employed by or contract with an animal shelter to provide veterinary medical services.(2) Complete a board-approved application.(3) Certify that the sole purpose of the shelter veterinarian license is to practice veterinary medicine for an animal shelter.(4) Pay the applicable fee specified in Section 4905.(5) Submit a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and undergo a state and federal criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(6) Pass an examination concerning the statutes and regulations of this chapter, administered by the board, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4846.(7) Disclose each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant currently holds or has ever held a license, registration, permit, or certificate to practice veterinary medicine. The license, registration, permit, or certificate verification, including any disciplinary or enforcement history, shall be confirmed by the board through electronic means or direct submission from each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant has identified the applicant holds or has ever held a license, registration, permit, or certificate to practice veterinary medicine.(8) Hold a current, valid veterinarian license in any state, Canadian province province, or United States territory.(c) All of the following apply to a shelter veterinarian license:(1) It is subject to denial, revocation, or suspension pursuant to Sections 480 and 4883.(2) It may be renewed if all of the following requirements are met:(A) Satisfaction of the license renewal provisions in Section 4900.(B) Payment of the renewal fee pursuant to Section 4905.(C) Completion of continuing education required under Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 4858).(D) Certification that the sole purpose of the shelter veterinarian license is to practice veterinary medicine for an animal shelter.(d) A shelter veterinarian licensee shall not practice veterinary medicine in any circumstance other than for an animal shelter or pursuant to Section 4826.1 or 4826.4.(e) For purposes of this section, “animal shelter” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4846.4.SEC. 11. Section 4858 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4858. (a) Except for the first renewal period, all holders of veterinarian licenses and veterinary technician registrations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall obtain continuing education relevant to developments in the practice of veterinary medicine.(b) A person applying for renewal of their license or registration or restoration of their license or registration to active status shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that they are in compliance with this article, as applicable.(c) The board shall have the right to audit the records of all applicants to verify the completion of the continuing education requirement. Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing education coursework for a period of four years and shall make these records available to the board upon request for auditing purposes. If the board, during this audit, questions whether any course reported by the applicant satisfies the continuing education requirement, the applicant shall provide information to the board concerning the content of the course, course hours, and the name of its sponsor and cosponsor.(d) An applicant may apply for an inactive license or to restore an inactive license under the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 1.(e) Notwithstanding Section 4858.1, the board, in its discretion, may exempt from the continuing education requirement an applicant who for reasons of health, military service, or undue hardship cannot meet those requirements. Applications for waivers shall be submitted on a form provided by the board.SEC. 12. Section 4858.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4858.1. (a) The board shall issue renewed or restored veterinarian licenses only to those applicants who have completed a minimum of 36 hours of continuing education in the preceding two years.(b) Continuing education hours for veterinarians shall be earned as follows:(1) Attending courses relevant to veterinary medicine and sponsored or cosponsored by any of the following:(A) The American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA), its accredited veterinary medical colleges, or its recognized specialty or affiliated allied groups or educational organizations.(B) State veterinary medical associations or their affiliated associations or educational organizations.(C) Federal, state, or local government agencies.(D) Providers accredited, approved, or recognized by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education (ACCME), American Medical Association (AMA), American Dental Association Continuing Education Recognition Program (ADA CERP), or American Association of Veterinary State Boards (AAVSB).(2) A total of 6 hours or fewer of the required 36 hours of continuing education may be earned by doing either of the following, or a combination thereof:(A) Up to six hours may be earned by taking self-study courses, which may include, but are not limited to, reading journals, viewing video recordings, or listening to audio recordings.(B) Up to four hours may be earned by providing pro bono spaying or neutering services for a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in compliance with the following:(i) The services shall be performed at a veterinary premises registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.(ii) Proof of completion of continuing education pursuant to this subparagraph shall be documented by the director or administrator of the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group, with a copy provided to the veterinarian, and include the date of performing the spaying and neutering services, the name, address, and telephone number of the entity for which the spaying and neutering services were provided, and the name, address, and veterinary premises registration where the spaying and neutering services were performed.(3) A veterinarian who teaches a course specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may receive continuing education credit for the course one time during a renewal period.(4) Up to 16 hours of continuing education credit may be earned by participating as an expert in an examination preparation workshop for the national licensing examination.(5) Up to 24 hours of continuing education credit may be earned for completing courses in business practice management or licensee mental health and wellness and its impact on the delivery of veterinary services.(6) Up to one hour of continuing education credit may be earned by passing the Veterinary Law Examination (VLE).(7) Up to two hours of continuing education credit may be earned by attending a board of Veterinary Medicine Multidisciplinary Advisory Committee meeting, as verified by the board.(c) Providers offering continuing education courses pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of Section 4858.3.(d) For good cause, the board may adopt an order specifying, on a prospective basis, that a course provider authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) is no longer an acceptable provider.(e) (1) A licensed veterinarian who renews their license shall complete a minimum of one credit hour of continuing education on the judicious use of medically important antimicrobial drugs every four years as part of their continuing education requirements.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “medically important antimicrobial drug” means an antimicrobial drug listed in Appendix A of the federal Food and Drug Administration’s Guidance for Industry #152, including critically important, highly important, and important antimicrobial drugs, as that appendix may be amended.SEC. 13. Section 4858.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4858.2. (a) The board shall issue renewed or restored veterinary technician registrations only to those applicants who have completed a minimum of 20 hours of continuing education in the preceding two years.(b) Continuing education hours for registered veterinary technicians shall be earned as follows:(1) Attending courses provided by those specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4858.1 or sponsored or cosponsored by one of the following:(A) National Association of Veterinary Technicians in America (NAVTA) recognized veterinary technician specialty organizations.(B) State veterinary technician associations recognized by the secretary of state in that state.(2) Up to 4 hours of the required 20 hours of continuing education may be earned by doing either of the following, or a combination thereof:(A) Up to four hours may be earned by taking self-study courses, which may include, but are not limited to, reading journals, viewing video recordings, or listening to audio recordings.(B) Up to two hours may be earned by performing pro bono animal health care tasks related to spaying or neutering services for a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in compliance with the following:(i) The services shall be performed under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian at a veterinary premises registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.(ii) Proof of completion of continuing education pursuant to this subparagraph shall be documented, with a copy provided to the registered veterinary technician, by the supervising veterinarian and include the date of performance of animal health care tasks, the name, address, and telephone number of the entity for which the animal health care tasks were provided, the name and veterinarian license number of the supervising veterinarian, and the name, address, and veterinary premises registration where the animal health care tasks were performed.(3) A registered veterinary technician who teaches a course described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may receive continuing education credit for the course one time during a renewal period.(4) Up to nine hours of continuing education credit may be earned by participating as an expert in an examination preparation workshop for the national licensing examination.(5) Up to 13 hours of continuing education credit may be earned for completing courses in business practice management or mental health and wellness and its impact on the delivery of veterinary services.(6) Up to one hour of continuing education credit may be earned by passing the Veterinary Law Examination.(7) Up to two hours of continuing education credit may be earned by attending a board or Veterinary Medicine Multidisciplinary Advisory Committee meeting, as verified by the board.(c) Providers offering continuing education courses pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of Section 4858.3.(d) For good cause, the board may adopt an order specifying, on a prospective basis, that a continuing education source authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) is no longer an acceptable source.SEC. 14. Section 4900 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4900. (a) All veterinarian licenses, veterinary technician registrations, and veterinary assistant controlled substance permits shall expire at 12 midnight of the last day of the month in which the license was issued during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.(b) (1) All premises registrations shall expire annually at 12 midnight of the last day of the month in which the premises registration was issued, unless renewed.(2) To renew a premises registration, the premises registration holder shall satisfy the requirements of subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 4853 and confirm that the information provided to the board is current and valid.(c) To renew an unexpired license, registration, or permit, the licensee, registrant, or permitholder shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license or registration, apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee. The renewal application shall contain a statement to the effect that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor, has not been the subject of professional disciplinary action taken by any public agency in any state or territory, and has not violated any of the provisions of this chapter. If the applicant is unable to make that statement, the application shall contain a statement of the conviction, professional discipline, or violation.(d) Each licensee, registrant, and permitholder who has an electronic mail address shall report to the board that electronic mail address during the time of renewal and confirm that the electronic mail address and address of record is current and valid. The electronic mail address shall be considered confidential and not subject to public disclosure.SEC. 15. Section 4901 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4901. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an expired license, retired license, registration, or permit may be renewed or restored to active status at any time within five years after its expiration by filing an application for renewal or the restoration on a form prescribed by the board, paying all accrued and unpaid renewal fees or the restoration fee, and complying with the continuing education requirements pursuant to Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 4858). If the license, registration, or permit is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, registrant, or permitholder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal or restoration to active status under this section shall be effective on the date on which all renewal or restoration requirements, as applicable, are satisfied. If so renewed or restored to active status, the license, registration, or permit shall continue in effect as provided in Section 4900.SEC. 16. Section 4902 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4902. (a) A license, registration, or permit that is not renewed within five years after its expiration shall be canceled and shall not be renewed, reissued, or reinstated unless the licensee, registrant, or permitholder meets all of the requirements for initial issuance of the license, registration, or permit.(b) A license or registration that has been assigned retired status pursuant to Section 4846.3 for five years or more shall not be restored to active status unless the licensee or registrant meets all of the requirements for initial issuance of the license or registration.SEC. 17. Section 4905 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4905. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Small veterinary premises” means a veterinary premises where up to three full-time equivalent veterinarians provide veterinary services.(2) “Medium veterinary premises” means a veterinary premises where four to eight full-time equivalent veterinarians provide veterinary services.(3) “Large veterinary premises” means a veterinary premises where nine or more full-time equivalent veterinarians provide veterinary services.(b) The following fees shall be collected by the board and shall be credited to the California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund:(1) The veterinarian license application fee shall not exceed five hundred forty dollars ($540).(2) The California Veterinary Medicine Practice Act course fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty-five dollars ($155).(3) The initial veterinarian license fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).(4) The biennial veterinarian license renewal fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).(5) The university licensee application fee shall not exceed five hundred forty dollars ($540).(6) The initial university license fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).(7) The biennial university licensee renewal fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).(8) The initial small veterinary premises registration fee shall not exceed eight hundred forty dollars ($840) annually.(9) The annual small veterinary premises registration renewal fee shall not exceed nine hundred ten dollars ($910).(10) The initial medium veterinary premises registration fee shall not exceed one thousand one hundred twenty dollars ($1,120).(11) The annual medium veterinary premises registration renewal fee shall not exceed one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).(12) The initial large veterinary premises registration fee shall not exceed one thousand six hundred seventy-five dollars ($1,675).(13) The annual large veterinary premises registration renewal fee shall not exceed one thousand seven hundred forty-five dollars ($1,745).(14) The registered veterinary technician application fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(15) The initial registered veterinary technician registration fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(16) The biennial registered veterinary technician renewal fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(17) The veterinary assistant controlled substance permit application fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(18) The veterinary assistant controlled substance permit fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(19) The biennial veterinary assistant controlled substance permit renewal fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(20) All license, registration, and permit delinquency fees shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal, but shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(21) The application fee for retired status of a veterinarian license or veterinary technician registration shall not be less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).(22) The application fee for retired volunteer status shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).(23) The biennial renewal fee for a license or registration with retired volunteer status shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).(24) The fee to restore a license or registration from retired status or retired volunteer status to active status shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).(25) The shelter veterinarian license application fee shall not be less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) nor more than five hundred forty dollars ($540).(26) The initial shelter veterinarian license fee shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than eight hundred dollars ($800).(27) The biennial shelter veterinarian license renewal fee shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than eight hundred dollars ($800).SEC. 18. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.